Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-529
Enlarged district; power to contract with cities for use of city sewers.

Such enlarged sanitary drainage district shall have power to enter into contracts with any or all municipalities wholly or partly within its territorial boundaries for the use in whole or in part of any sewerage system or sewerage mains in operation in said municipality or to be constructed or operated by such municipality.

Laws 1919, c. 240, § 6, p. 1002;

C.S.1922, § 1885;

C.S.1929, § 31-623;

R.S.1943, § 31-529.